Hawaii statutes.
§88-124 Payment of state contributions to
the system. (a) The State shall pay to the various funds of the system
the amounts payable by the State under this part. Payments shall be made:

(1) On a monthly basis, within thirty days after the
end of each month; or

(2) In advance, in an amount greater than the amount
payable for the current fiscal quarter, taking into account amounts previously
paid during the quarter and any offsets for any excess contributions in the
previous quarter.

(b) The system shall determine the actual
amount owed by the State under this part for each fiscal quarter, commencing
with the first fiscal quarter of fiscal year 2005-2006. The actual amounts
owed by the State for the fiscal quarter shall be compared against the amounts
paid in the fiscal quarter and any excess contributions from the previous
quarter. Any additional contributions owed by the State for a fiscal quarter
shall be paid before the end of the next fiscal quarter. Any excess
contributions by the State may be used to offset amounts owed by the State for
the next fiscal quarter. [L 1925, c 55, pt of §8; am L Sp 1933, c 10, §3; RL
1935, pt of §7927; am L 1935, c 48, §2; RL 1945, §712, subs 6; RL 1955, §6-100;
am L Sp 1959 1st, c 13, §2; HRS §88-115; am L 1969, c 110, pt of §1; am L 2004,
c 181, §4; am L 2005, c 58, §15; am L 2016, c 31, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next